California statutes. Corporations Code
 constituent other business entity, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110 and subject to the provisions of subdivision (j), and the several parties thereto shall be one entity. If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger, the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger pursuant to Section 1555 of the Insurance Code. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the agreement of merger separate from the officers’ certificates and certificates of merger attached thereto.

(2) If the surviving entity is an other business entity, and no public benefit corporation, mutual benefit corporation, religious corporation, or corporation organized under the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3) is a party to
 the merger, after required approvals of the merger by each constituent social purpose corporation through approval of the board and any approval of the outstanding shares required by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400) and by the other parties to the merger, the parties to the merger shall file a certificate of merger in the office of, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each constituent domestic and foreign social purpose corporation by its chairperson of the board, president, or a vice president and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary and by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all managers of the limited liability company, unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement, and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners, unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement,
 and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners, unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement, and by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed those officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact. The certificate of merger shall be signed by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for that party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the
 signing persons. The certificate of merger shall set forth all of the following:

(A) The name, place of incorporation or organization, and the Secretary of State’s file number, if any, of each party to the merger, separately identifying the disappearing parties and the surviving party.

(B) If the approval of the outstanding shares of a constituent social purpose corporation was required by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400), a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the principal terms of the agreement of merger were approved by a vote of the number of shares of each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(C) The future effective date or time, not more than 90 days subsequent to the date of filing of
 the merger, if the merger is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger with the Secretary of State.

(D) A statement, by each party to the merger that is a domestic corporation not organized under this division, a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, or an other business entity, of the statutory or other basis under which that party is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(E) Any other information required to be stated in the certificate of merger by the laws under which each respective party to the merger is organized, including, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17552, if a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section
 15911.14.

(F) Any other details or provisions that may be desired.

Unless a future effective date or time is provided in a certificate of merger, in which event the merger shall be effective at that future effective date or time, a merger shall be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger with the Secretary of State and the several parties thereto shall be one entity. The surviving other business entity shall keep a copy of the agreement of merger at its principal place of business which, for purposes of this subdivision, shall be the office referred to in Section 17057 if a domestic limited liability company, at the business address specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17552 if a foreign limited liability company, at the office referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 16403 if a domestic general partnership, at the business address specified in subdivision (f) of
 Section 16911 if a foreign partnership, at the office referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 15901.14 if a domestic limited partnership, or at the business address specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14 if a foreign limited partnership. Upon the request of a holder of equity securities of a party to the merger, a person with authority to do so on behalf of the surviving other business entity shall promptly deliver to that holder, a copy of the agreement of merger. A waiver by that holder of the rights provided in the foregoing sentence shall be unenforceable. If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger in accordance with Section 1555 of the Insurance Code.

(h) (1) A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving party to the merger, and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger.

(2) For all purposes for a merger in which the surviving entity is a domestic other business entity and the filing of a certificate of merger is required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent corporations, either by themselves or together with the other parties to the merger,
 into the surviving other business entity.

(i) (1) Upon a merger pursuant to this section, the separate existences of the disappearing parties to the merger cease and the surviving party to the merger shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing parties to the merger and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each in the same manner as if the surviving party to the merger had itself incurred them.

(2) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent social purpose corporations and other parties to the merger shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that those liens upon property of a disappearing party shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(3) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing social purpose corporation or disappearing party to the merger may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving party, or the surviving party may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the liability a general partner of a disappearing limited partnership or general partnership may have in connection with the debts and liabilities of the disappearing limited partnership or general partnership existing prior to the time the merger is effective.

(j) (1) The merger of domestic social purpose corporations with foreign corporations or foreign other business entities in a merger in which one or more other business entities is a party shall comply with
 subdivision (a) and this subdivision.

(2) If the surviving party is a domestic social purpose corporation or domestic other business entity, the merger proceedings with respect to that party and any domestic disappearing social purpose corporation shall conform to the provisions of this section. If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (c), Section 407, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400), and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, and, if applicable, corresponding provisions of the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5002)) or the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3), with respect to any domestic constituent corporations, Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 17600) of Title 2.5 with respect to any domestic constituent limited liability companies,
 Article 6 (commencing with Section 16601) of Chapter 5 of Title 2 with respect to any domestic constituent general partnerships, and Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 15911.20) of Chapter 5.5 of Title 2 with respect to any domestic constituent limited partnerships, the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of incorporation or organization of the surviving party.

(3) If the surviving party is a domestic social purpose corporation or domestic other business entity, the certificate of merger or the agreement of merger with attachments shall be filed as provided in subdivision (g) and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), as applicable, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent social purpose corporation and domestic constituent other business entity.

(4) If the surviving
 party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the surviving party is organized, but, except as provided in paragraph (5), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing social purpose corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent foreign and domestic social purpose corporation and a certificate of merger of each constituent other business entity attached, which officers’ certificates and certificates of merger shall conform to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g). If one or more domestic other business entities is a disappearing party in a merger pursuant to this subdivision in which a foreign other business entity is the surviving entity, a certificate of merger required by the laws under which that domestic other business entity
 is organized, including subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, or subdivision (a) of Section 17552, as is applicable, shall also be filed at the same time as the filing of the agreement of merger.

(5) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to this subdivision is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of a domestic disappearing social purpose corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing social purpose corporation as of the date of filing in this state.

(6) In a merger described in paragraph (3) or (4), each foreign disappearing social purpose corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall by virtue of the filing pursuant to this subdivision,
 subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business in this state. The filing of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, as is applicable, pursuant to this subdivision, by a disappearing foreign other business entity registered for the transaction of intrastate business in this state shall, by virtue of that filing, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110, automatically cancel the registration for that foreign other business entity, without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 54.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Conversions [3300. - 3307.]

3300.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Converted social purpose corporation” means a social purpose corporation that results from a conversion of an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation pursuant to Section 3307.

(b) “Converted entity” means a domestic other business entity that results from a conversion of a social purpose corporation under this chapter.

(c) “Converting social purpose corporation” means a social purpose corporation that converts into a domestic other business entity pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Converting entity” means an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or foreign corporation that converts into a social purpose corporation pursuant to Section 3307.

(e) “Domestic other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 167.7.

(f) “Foreign other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 171.07.

(g) “Other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 174.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 55.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

(a) A social purpose corporation may be converted into a domestic other business entity pursuant to this chapter if, pursuant to the proposed conversion, each of the following conditions is met:

(1) Each share of the same class or series of the converting social purpose corporation shall, unless all the shareholders of the class or series consent, be treated equally with respect to any cash, rights, securities, or other property to be received by, or any obligations or restrictions to be imposed on, the holder of that share.

(2) The conversion is approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if
 required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles.

(3) Nonredeemable common shares of the converting social purpose corporation shall be converted only into nonredeemable equity securities of the converted entity unless all of the shareholders of the class consent.

(4) Paragraph (1) shall not restrict the ability of the shareholders of a converting social purpose corporation to appoint one or more managers, if the converted entity is a limited liability company, or one or more general partners, if the converted entity is a limited partnership, in the plan of conversion or in the converted entity’s governing documents.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the conversion of a social purpose corporation into a domestic other business entity may be
 effected only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The law under which the converted entity will exist expressly permits the formation of that entity pursuant to a conversion.

(2) The social purpose corporation complies with any and all other requirements of any other law that applies to conversion to the converted entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 56.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

(a) A social purpose corporation that desires to convert to a domestic other business entity shall approve a plan of conversion. The plan of conversion shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the conversion.

(2) The jurisdiction of the organization of the converted entity and of the converting social purpose corporation and the name of the converted entity after conversion.

(3) The manner of converting the shares of each of the shareholders of the converting social purpose corporation into securities of, or interests in, the converted entity.

(4) The provisions of the governing documents for the converted entity, including the articles and bylaws, partnership agreement or limited liability company articles of organization and operating agreement, to which the holders of interests in the converted entity are to be bound.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are required by the laws under which the converted entity is organized, or that are desired by the converting social purpose corporation.

(b) The plan of conversion shall be approved by the board of the converting social purpose corporation, and the principal terms of the plan of the conversion shall be approved by at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of
 the articles of the converting social purpose corporation. The approval of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares may be given before or after approval by the board. If the plan is approved, shareholders with dissenting shares, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, may exercise dissenters’ rights pursuant to Section 3305 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1.

(c) If the social purpose corporation is converting into a general or limited partnership or into a limited liability company, then in addition to the approval of the shareholders set forth in subdivision (b), the plan of conversion shall be approved by each shareholder who will become a general partner or manager, as applicable, of the converted entity pursuant to the plan of conversion unless the shareholders have dissenters’ rights pursuant to Section 3305 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1.

(d) Upon the effectiveness of the conversion, all shareholders of the converting social purpose corporation, except those that exercise dissenters’ rights as provided in Section 3305 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, shall be deemed parties to any agreement or agreements constituting the governing documents for the converted entity adopted as part of the plan of conversion, regardless of whether a shareholder has executed the plan of conversion or those governing documents for the converted entity. Any adoption of governing documents made pursuant thereto shall be effective at the effective time or date of the conversion.

(e) Notwithstanding its prior approval by the board and the outstanding shares, or either of them, a plan of conversion may be amended before the conversion takes effect if the amendment is approved by the board and, if it changes any of
 the principal terms of the plan of conversion, by the shareholders of the converting social purpose corporation in the same manner and to the same extent as was required for approval of the original plan of conversion.

(f) A plan of conversion may be abandoned by the board of a converting social purpose corporation, or by the shareholders of a converting social purpose corporation if the abandonment is approved by the outstanding shares, in each case in the same manner as required for approval of the plan of conversion, subject to the contractual rights of third parties, at any time before the conversion is effective.

(g) The converted entity shall keep the plan of conversion at the principal place of business of the converted entity if the converted entity is a domestic partnership, or at the office at which records are to be kept under Section 15901.14 if the converted entity is
 a domestic limited partnership, or at the office at which records are to be kept under Section 17701.13 if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company. Upon the request of a shareholder of a converting social purpose corporation, the authorized person on behalf of the converted entity shall promptly deliver to the shareholder, at the expense of the converted entity, a copy of the plan of conversion. A waiver by a shareholder of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 57.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

(a) After the approval, as provided in Section 3302, of a plan of conversion by the board and the outstanding shares of a social purpose corporation converting into a domestic other business entity, the converting social purpose corporation shall cause the filing of all documents required by law to effect the conversion and create the converted entity, which documents shall include a certificate of conversion or a statement of conversion as required by Section 3304, and the conversion shall thereupon be effective.

(b) A copy of the statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, or articles of organization complying with Section 3304, duly certified by the Secretary of State on or after the effective
 date, shall be conclusive evidence of the conversion of the social purpose corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 58.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

(a) To convert a social purpose corporation:

(1) If the social purpose corporation is converting into a domestic limited partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the certificate of limited partnership for the converted entity.

(2) If the social purpose corporation is converting into a domestic partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the statement of partnership authority for the converted entity, or if no statement of partnership authority is filed, then a certificate of conversion shall be filed separately.

(3) If the social purpose corporation is
 converting into a domestic limited liability company, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the articles of organization for the converted entity.

(b) Any statement or certificate of conversion of a converting social purpose corporation shall be executed and acknowledged by those officers of the converting social purpose corporation as would be required to sign an officers’ certificate, and shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name and the Secretary of State’s file number of the converting social purpose corporation.

(2) A statement of the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the conversion, that the principal terms of the plan of conversion were approved by a vote of the number of shares of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required under Section 3302,
 specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(3) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converted entity.

(4) The name and street address of the converted entity’s agent for service of process. If a corporation qualified under Section 1505 is designated as the agent, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) The certificate of conversion shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(d) The filing with the Secretary of State of a statement of conversion on an organizational document or a certificate of conversion as set forth in subdivision (a) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of dissolution by the converting social purpose corporation and no converting social
 purpose corporation that has made the filing is required to file a certificate of election under Section 1901 or a certificate of dissolution under Section 1905 as a result of that conversion.

(e) Upon the effectiveness of a conversion pursuant to this chapter, a converted entity that is a domestic partnership, domestic limited partnership, or domestic limited liability company shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of the converting social purpose corporation to prepare and file or cause to be prepared and filed all tax and information returns otherwise required of the converting social purpose corporation under the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and to pay any tax liability determined to be due pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 9.5.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

The shareholders with dissenting rights, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, of a converting social purpose corporation shall have all of the rights under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of the shareholders of a corporation involved in a reorganization requiring the approval of its outstanding shares, and the converting social purpose corporation shall have all of the obligations under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of a corporation involved in the reorganization. Solely for purposes of applying the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, and not for purposes of this chapter, a conversion pursuant to Section 3301 or 3307 shall be deemed to constitute a reorganization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 60.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Secretary of State shall charge an entity a fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for its conversion made under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 740, Sec. 12.   (SB 201)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

(a) An other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation may be converted into a social purpose corporation pursuant to this chapter only if the converting entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the conversion.

(b) An other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation that desires to convert into a social purpose corporation shall approve a plan of conversion or other instrument as is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under which that entity is organized.

(c) The conversion of an other business entity or a
 foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation shall be approved by the number or percentage of the partners, members, shareholders, or other holders of interest of the converting entity that is required by the laws under which that entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage as may be set forth in the converting entity’s partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating agreement, articles of incorporation, or other governing document in accordance with applicable laws.

(d) The conversion by an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation shall be effective under this chapter upon the filing with the Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation of the converted corporation, containing a statement of conversion that complies with subdivision (e).

(e) A statement of conversion of an entity converting into a
 social purpose corporation pursuant to this chapter shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converting entity.

(2) The Secretary of State’s file number, if any, of the converting entity.

(3) If the converting entity is a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation, the statement of conversion shall contain the following:

(A) A statement that the converting entity is authorized to effect the conversion by the laws under which it is organized.

(B) A statement that the converting entity has approved a plan of conversion or other instrument as is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under
 which the converting entity is organized.

(C) A statement that the conversion has been approved by the number or percentage of the partners, members, shareholders, or other holders of interest of the converting entity that is required by the laws under which that entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage as may be set forth in the converting entity’s partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating agreement, articles of incorporation, or other governing document in accordance with applicable laws.

(f) The filing with the Secretary of State of articles of incorporation containing a statement pursuant to subdivision (e) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation by a converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited partnership, and no converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited partnership that has
 made the filing is required to file a certificate of cancellation under Section 17708.06 or 15909.07 as a result of that conversion. If a converting entity is a foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this state, the foreign corporation shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 61.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Reorganizations [3400. - 3401.]

3400.

A reorganization or a share exchange tender offer shall be approved by the board of all of the following:

(a) Each constituent social purpose corporation in a merger reorganization.

(b) The acquiring social purpose corporation in an exchange reorganization.

(c) The acquiring social purpose corporation and the social purpose corporation whose property and assets are acquired in a sale-of-assets reorganization.

(d) The acquiring social purpose corporation in a share exchange tender offer.

(e) The social purpose corporation in control of any constituent or acquiring domestic or foreign social purpose corporation or other business entity under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) and whose equity securities are issued, transferred, or exchanged in the reorganization, hereafter a “parent party.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 62.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

(a) The principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares of each class of each social purpose corporation the approval of whose board is required under Section 3400, except as provided in subdivision (b) and except that, unless otherwise provided in the articles, no approval of any class of outstanding preferred shares of the surviving or acquiring social purpose corporation or parent party shall be required if the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon that class of shares remain unchanged, subject to the provisions of subdivision (c). For the purpose of this subdivision, two classes of common shares differing only as to voting rights shall be considered as a single class of shares.

(b) No approval of the outstanding shares is required by subdivision (a) if the social purpose corporation, or its shareholders immediately before the reorganization, or both, shall own, immediately after the reorganization, equity securities, other than any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase those equity securities, of the surviving or acquiring social purpose corporation or a parent party possessing more than five-sixths of the voting power of the surviving or acquiring social purpose corporation or parent party. In making the determination of ownership by the shareholders of a social purpose corporation, immediately after the reorganization, of equity securities pursuant to the preceding sentence, equity securities that they owned immediately before the reorganization as shareholders of another party to the transaction shall be disregarded. For the purpose of this section, the voting power of a social purpose corporation shall be
 calculated by assuming the conversion of all equity securities convertible, immediately or at some future time, into shares entitled to vote but not assuming the exercise of any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase those shares.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares of the surviving social purpose corporation in a merger reorganization, as otherwise required by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400), if any amendment is made to its articles that would otherwise require that approval.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of the outstanding shares of any class of a social purpose corporation that is a party
 to a merger or sale-of-assets reorganization if holders of shares of that class receive shares of the surviving or acquiring social purpose corporation or parent party having different rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions than those surrendered. Shares in a foreign corporation received in exchange for shares in a domestic social purpose corporation shall be deemed to have different rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions within the meaning of the preceding sentence.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of the outstanding shares of any social purpose corporation that is a close social purpose corporation if the reorganization would result in the holders receiving shares or other interests of a corporation or other business entity that is not a close
 social purpose corporation. The articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority of the outstanding shares of each class.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of a social purpose corporation that is a party to a merger reorganization, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if holders of shares of that class receive interests of a surviving other business entity in the merger that is not a social purpose corporation, or receive interests of a surviving social purpose corporation the articles of incorporation of which specify a materially different purpose as part of the reorganization.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)
 and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by all shareholders of any class or series if, as a result of the reorganization, the holders of that class or series become personally liable for any obligations of a party to the reorganization, unless all holders of that class or series have the dissenters’ rights provided in Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1.

(h) Any approval required by this section may be given before or after the approval by the board. Notwithstanding approval required by this section, the board may abandon the proposed reorganization without further action by the shareholders, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 63.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Records and Reports [3500. - 3503.]

3500.

(a) The board of a social purpose corporation shall cause an annual report to be sent to the shareholders not later than 120 days after the close of the fiscal year. The annual report shall contain (1) a balance sheet as of the end of that fiscal year and an income statement and a statement of cashflows for that fiscal year, accompanied by any report thereon of independent accountants or, if there is no report, the certificate of an authorized officer of the social purpose corporation that the statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation, and (2) the information required by subdivision (b).

(b) The board shall cause to be provided with the annual report, a management discussion and
 analysis (special purpose MD&A) concerning the social purpose corporation’s stated purpose or purposes as set forth in its articles pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2602, and, to the extent consistent with reasonable confidentiality requirements, shall cause the special purpose MD&A to be made publicly available by posting it on the social purpose corporation’s Internet Web site or providing it through similar electronic means. The special purpose MD&A shall include the information specified in this subdivision and any other information that the social purpose corporation’s officers and directors believe to be reasonably necessary or appropriate to an understanding of the social purpose corporation’s efforts in connection with its special purpose or purposes. The special purpose MD&A shall also include the following information:

(1) Identification and discussion of the overall objectives of the social
 purpose corporation relating to its special purpose or purposes, and an identification and explanation of any changes made in those special purpose objectives during the fiscal year.

(2) Identification and discussion of the material actions taken by the social purpose corporation during the fiscal year to achieve its special purpose objectives, the impact of those actions, including the causal relationships between the actions and the reported outcomes, and the extent to which those actions achieved the special purpose objectives for the fiscal year.

(3) Identification and discussion of material actions, including the intended impact of those actions, that the social purpose corporation expects to take in the short term and long term with respect to achievement of its special purpose objectives.

(4) A description of
 the process for selecting, and an identification and description of, the financial, operating, and other measures used by the social purpose corporation during the fiscal year for evaluating its performance in achieving its special purpose objectives, including an explanation of why the social purpose corporation selected those measures and identification and discussion of the nature and rationale for any material changes in those measures made during the fiscal year.
